ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/de_CH/1996/hyph_de_CH.dic
UTF-8
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2011 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.1
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
NOHYPHEN -,',’
1-1
1'1
1’1
NEXTLEVEL
.a2
.ar2s2
.a2n1s
.an3sc
.a1n1e
.an1gr
.an3k
.as1t1
.a1ch1i
.ae1
.a1b1a
.a1b1i
.abschie4
.a2b1s
.ab1sc
.ab3schi
.a1b1u
.au2s1
.au3s4se2n.
.aus1s
.aus1se
.aus3t
.a2u1t
.au2f1
.ap1p
.r2
.ro1b
.re1pu3
.ru3s1se
.rü1b
.rös1
.o2
.ori1
.or1c
.o4m1a
.2om
.n2
.na2c
.n1a1b
.i2
.in1
.in1ei3
.i1ne
.indust3
.in1du
.indus1
.i4sc
.ide3en
.i1de
.i2dee2
.s2
.3s2a1s2
.1sa1la
.si1g
.1si
.sch2
.1sc
.schu4h
.sch3wand
.süh3nt
.sü2
.s4ti
.s4te
.he1rü1
.hei3s2se
.e2
.er1ob
.e1r1i
.e1r1e
.er3bl
.er1b
.er4drü
.er1dr2
.er1k
.en2dr2
.en2d3er
.en1de
.en2t
.ent3ei
.en1te
.e1k1l
.e4ta
.ex1e
.bau1s
.1ba
.bi2o
.1bi
.be1ra
.b2er
.bü4r2o.
.1bü
.bü1ro
.äs1
.äu1
.äus2
.d2
.dis1
.1di
.di3e2s.
.de2rei
.1de
.de1re
.de1l
.la1be
.2lab
.lie4der.
.lie1d
.liede2r
.lie1de
.u2
.un1s2t
.u2ns
.u1n1e
.ul1
.um1
.g2
.galeri3en
.1ga
.ga1le
.ga1ler
.gale1ri
.gross3
.gros2
.grü1s2
.1grü
.gi2s
.1gi
.gies3
.ge1s2
.1ge
.geschen4ke
.ge3sc
.gesch2
.geb2
.ge1bl
.k2
.kam1pa3
.1ka
.kamp2
.ke2l2c
.t2
.ta1b
.tras3
.ti2s
.1ti
.theori3en
.1theo1
.the1or
.m2
.materia3li
.1ma
.ma1te
.mate1ri
.mate1ri1a
.mi2t
.1mi
.v2ol2
.1v
.vie1r3u
.1wa2s
.wa3sche
.wa1sc
.wi2s
.1wä4s
.p2
.1pro1b
.prob3l
.zi2s
.1zi
.zi3g
.for4t
.1fo
.fi2s
.1fi
.fe1ri1
.1fe
.fel4der
.fe2l
.fel1de
.feld3ern
.ö2
.que2
.1q
.qu2
2a.
a1an
aa1c
aa1b
aa2ts3
a1ra
ar1all
ar1au
ar1af
arri1e
ar1ri
a1ro
ar1o1d
2a1ri
ar1inn
ari3er.
ari1es
ar2schr2
ars2
ar1sc
ar2s2ch2m
ar1s3p2
1ar1c
a1re
ar2b3s
ar1b
ar2bl
a1rä
ar2les
ar1l
a1ru
ar1um
ar2gl
ar1g
a1r1ü1
art1he
ar3te
ar1tu
a1on
a2o1i
a1os
a1ou
a1ot
anas1
a1nag
an1or
ann4tes
ann1te
a1ni
a2n1is1l
a1nis
a1ni1g
a2nim
ansich4
a2ns
an1si
an1s1h
an1s1kr
an1s2t
an1c
1anek
a1ne
an1em
an1äs
an1dac
and1re
andr2
and1rü
and2sa
an2ds
an2d3eng
an1de
andes3
1an1l
a1nu
an2g1ar
an1ga
ang3sam
ang2s
an1g1li
1an1ka
an2kr
an2k1op
an1ko
1an1kä
an2tar
an1ta
1an1tr
an1tho
1ant1w
anz1w
1an1fa
a1nö
ai1ro
ais1s
ai1e
a3ig
a1i1v
a1sa
a2si1a
a1si
asili2e
asi1li
a3schu
a1sc
2a1se
aseri3e
ase1ri
ase2n
a2sent
ast1au
ast1ro
as1to
as1tu
as1mu2
as1m
as1p2
a1sy
ach1au
ach1ra
achr2
a1chro
ach1re
a2ch1n2
a1chi
a1che
a2ch1ei2
ach1ä
a2ch1l
a1chu
a2ch3m
ach1w
a1ce
a1cki
ac2k
ahal2
ah1au
ah1re
ahr3ern
ah1rer
ah1os
ah2n1s
ah1nu
a1hi
a1he
ahe1s
ah1li
ah1le
a1el
ab1r
3abre
ab1ir
a1bi
a2b1s
abs2te
1ab1h
ab1ä
1a2b1d
ab1l
1ab1v
3a2b1w
1ab1z
1a2b1f
ad1r2
ad1op
ad1st
a2ds
al1ang
ala2sc
a2l1ab
al1au
a2l1ak
al1am
a1lo
a1li
al2stü
a2ls
al1sp2
a2l1c
a1le
1alea
al1ert
a1ler
a2lei
al1ein
a2l1el
a1l1ef
albibli3
a2lb
al1bi
albi1b
albib1l
a1lä
al3la
al2l1ab
al3le2r
al1le
alk1s1
a2lk
al1tra
al1to
alt1s2t
al2ts
al2tei
al1te
2a1ly
au1a
au1r
au1i
2au1so
aus1s
2au2s2c
aus1ta
aus3tre
2auc
2aue
au1em
2aub
aub1l
au1lu
au1ta
a2ut
au2t1s
2aum
aup4t2e.
au2pt
aup1te
au2fa
au2fo
1auf1n
ag1ar
a1ga
ag1an
aga2b
a2g1au
ag1rip
a3go
a1gner
ag1n
ag1ne
ag3s1te
ag2s
a3ge2n.
a1ge
a2gent
age2s2
age3st
a2gem
a2ge1v
ag1l
a1gy
a3kau
a1ka
ak1ro
a1kr
a1ki
a1ke
a2kes
1ak1z
a1ta
at1ar
ata1s
a1t1r
a1to
a2t1ort
at1int
a1ti
at1s1si
a2ts
ats1s
at3sche
at1sc
at2s1e
at2c
a2t1hil
at2he
a2t1eig
a1te
a1tu
a1tü
at1tr
at2t1s
at1th
atz1w
ama1h
a1ma
ama3g
a1mo2
2ams
a3m2e.
a1me
2amet
am2t1a
am1p1r
am2pl
2a1v
ave3re2
ave2
aver1
a1w
awi1
a1pa
apo1s
a1pi
api1en
a1ph
a1pe
ap2fa
a1z
aze1s1
a1ze
a2fa
a3far
af1re
af2tau
af1ta
aje2
a1j
ay1
a2q
a1xo
a1xi
a1xe
1r2a.
1r1ar1c
2r1ar1b
2r1art
r1arm
r1arz
r1an1r
rans1p2
ra2ns
r1an1b
r1an1w
r1anf
1ra1ha
r1ahn
ra1be
2r1a2b1d
ra1da
1ra2ds
rali1e
ra1li
ra2l1s
1ra1le
2ralt
1ral1w
1ralf
ra1gr
rag3st
rag2s
r3a2gent
ra1ge
ra2ka
ra1kl
ra1ku
r1ak1k
1rath
ra2tei
ra1te
ra1pr
ra2z
raf1an
ra2fa
raf2t1s
r1ra
r1ro
rr1ob
r1ri
rrin1n
rr1c
r1re
rreis3s
r1rest2
r1rä
r1ru
rr2ut3
r1rü
rrü1b
rr1tu
r1rö
r1r2y
ro1a
ro1ri
r2on
2ro2n.
ro2n1s
1r2oi
ro1in
ro1is
ros1i1o
ro1si
ro1sk
ro1s1w
ro1sp2
ro1ch
ro2hei
ro1he
ro1ben
1ro1lo
r2ol
1rol1li
1rou
ro1pe
ro1pp
1ro1ö
1roy1
r1na
r2n1ab
r2n1au
r1no
rn1ost
r1ni
rn1str
r2ns
rn1sp2
rn1c
r1nä
rn1do
r1nu
r1nü
rn2kä
rn3ta
1ri.
1ri1a
ri2as
2r1ir
ri3ol
ri1o
r3inner
rin1ne
2rind
ri2st
richti3gt
ric2ht
rich1ti
rich3tig
1rih
1riea
ri1ent
3rie1bet
rie1be
1ri1el
1rie1z
r2ig
3riginel2ls
ri1gi
rigi1ne
1ri1ge
ri1ki
ri4ken
ri1ke
1rik1ti
r2it
ri1ta
ri2ve2
ri1v
1riz
rs2
r1sa
rs3ang
rs3no
rs1n2
r3si
rs3s
r3sche
r1sc
rs3he2
rs1h
r2s3emp
r1se
rs3ep
rs3l
r1sü2
r1star
r1stan
r1stal
r1stat
r1staf
r1str
r1sto
rs3ter
rs1te
rs3tem
r1stu
rs3m
r1sp2
rs3pek
rs3f
r1sy
r1ca
rcont1
r1co
r1ci
rch1au
r1chi
rchi3en
rch1st
rc2hs
r1chen
r2ch1ei
r2ch1l
r2ch3m
r1h
1r2hy
1r2e.
re1a
re4a1lis4t
rea1li
1rer
3rer.
2r1er1nä
2r3erst
rers2
r1er1ka
r1er1ke
2r1erkl
2r1erz
2r1erf
1re2n.
re1ni
rent1h
2r3ent1w
ren3ma3s2
ren1m
ren1ma
rei2na
2r1ein1r
rei2ns4
rein3s3t2e.
reins1te
rei4chert
rei1che
1re2s.
res1a
2re1sc
1re1su
1rest
res1ta
re1s1p2
2reh
2ree
re1el
1reda
re1d
re1le
reg3s
re2t2s
remi1e
r2e1mi
2re2w
rewa2
re1po
1re1z
1re1fl
2reff
r1b
rbi3o
r1bi
r2b2s
rb3sc
r2bli
r3blie
3r2ä2n.
3r2ä1ni1
1rä1i
1rä1e
1räl
räus3s
räu1e
2räg
1rät
r1da
r3dan
rda2m
r1dr2
r3dri
r1do
r2ds2
rd1st
r2d3er1ge
r1de
rder1g
r1dä
r2d1t
r1l
r2lost
r2ls1
r2l1c
rlö3sc
1ru1a
r1ur
ru1ni
2r1u2n1s
2rund
run2der
run1de
1ru1i
rus2sen
rus1se
2ruk1tu
r2ut2
ru1ta
rut3h
1ru2m.
1ru1me
ruf2s
ruf2t
ruf2z2
r1g
r2g1ar1b
r1ga
r2g1au
rgrö4
rgrös3
r2gno
rg1n
r2g2s
rg3sa
rg3s1k
rg3s1p2
rge2ns2
r1ge
rgen3st
rge1sa
rges2
rg1lo
rüs1
rü1ben
rübe2
rkon1t3r
r1ko
r1k2n2
rknäu1
r1ki
rk1sta
rks2t
rk1str
r1ke
r1kla
rk1lic
r1ku
rk2tei
rk1te
r1ta
r2t1ar
r2t1a2b1s
r1tr
r1to
r3ti
r2t1hi
r3tei
r1te
r3tem
r1tä
rt1urt
r2t1un2d1
r1tum
r1tü
rt1t
rt1z
r1tö
rm1ana
r1ma
r3mac
r3mak
rmi2s
r1mi
rm1s2p2
r1mä
r1mü
r1w
r1p2
r2ps
rz1ar
r2z1op
r1zo
r2z1in
r1zi
rz2he
rz1h
r2z1eng
r1ze
r1zwi
r1zwu
r1fr
rfe1ri1
r1fe
r1fl
r2f1lic
r3fu
r1ör
rös2s
rö3s1se
rö1c
r1ö2f
r2y
r1x
2o.
o1an
o1ah
o1ab
o1al1bu
oa2lb
o1au
o1at
o1ap
o1ra2ns
o1rant
o1ranz
ora2s
o2rah
ora2b
oradi3os
ora1di
oradi1o
o1r1au
o1ro1
orn1st
or2ns
or2in1
o1r2it
or1sta
ors2
or1che
2or1h
orhi2
o1re
or1ein
o1rä
or2da
ord1a2m
1or2d1n
or2g1n
or1g
or2g1l
o1r1ü
ork1s
or2t1an
or1ta
ort1s2t
or2ts
or1th
orte4ten
or1te
orte1te
or1tu
or1z
o1r2y
o1or
ook1
oo2mo
o2om
o1op
o1na
on1ar1b
o3nat
o1no
ono1c
on2na
o1ni
2on2s.
o2ns
ons1a
ons1p2
onei3
o1ne
o1nä
o1nu
o1nus1
on1gr
on3f
1o1ny
2oi
oi2n1s1
o1il
o3sa
os1o1d
o1so
osi2e
o1si
oss3elt
os1se
oss3te
oss2t
osen1
o1se
o3sex
ost1a2s
o1s3tit
os1ti
o1s3tel
os1te
o1s1tü
os1pe
osp2
o1sy
o1ci1
och1a2
ochi1r
o1che
o2ch1l
o1chu
o2ch3m
och1w
o1c1ka
oc2k
o1cki
o1ha
oh1re
o1ho
ohn1a
oh1nu
o2h1s
o1he
ohl1a
oh1lo
oh1li
oh1le
o1hu
o1e
oes2f
o3e2b
oe1t
ob1ac
o1ba
ob1r
ob1sa
o2bs
o3bers1te
ob2er
obers2
oben1d
o1bel
ob1l
1ob1j
o1d
o2dr2
o3di
odi1en
ode2t
o1de
2ol
o1la
o1lo
o1li
o1le
ole1ra
o1ler
ol1da
ol2lin
ol1li
oll3end
ol1le
ol2lu
o1lu
ol2pr
ol1p
ol1fr
ou1b
o1g
o1ga2
o2g2s
ogeri3en
o1ge
oge1ri
o2ge2s.
oges2
oge1sa
o2gd1
o1ü
o3ka
o1ki
o1ke
o1kl
o1ku
o1ta
o3tar.
ot1r
ot2ro
o1to
ot1s2t
o2ts
2o1t2h
otem1
o1te
o2temp2
o1tu
2om
o2m1au
o1ma
om1s2t
o1mä
o2ve3s
o1v
ove2
2ow
o1wa
o1wo
o1wi
o1we
o1pa
o1pr
op1ri
o1po
o1pi
opi1en
o1ph2
o1pä
op1li
op2le
op1um
o1pu
o2p1t
op2pl
op2f1a
op2f1es
op1fe
opf1l
2o1z
oze1r
o1ze
ofah2
o1fa
of1r
of1l
of2fa
o1ö
o1y1e
2o1q
o1xo
o1xi
o1xe
2n.
3n2a.
1naa
n2a1ri1
n1art
2n1a2n.
n1ana
n1an1r
1nann
n1a2n1s
n1an1d
2n1ang
n1anf
2nai
1nass
na3cke
nac2k
1nah
n1ab
na1bel
1nad
nal1st
na2ls
1nau.
1nau1i
1n2aue
n1a2ut
n1auf1
na2ka
1nat
na2ts1
2n1at1m
1na1me
n1amt
n1r
nra2s
n3ru
nrös1
1n2o.
no1ra
no1ri
nor1s2
nor1c
n1or1g
n1ort
1n2oi
2noh
no1b1l
1n2ol
n3o1le
n3oly
1nok
no2ta
1n2om
1no1v
1n2o1z
1no1fi
n1na
nn1ar
n1no
n1ni
nn1sa
n2ns
nn1sta
nn1c
n1nä
n1nu
nn1g
n1nü
n1nö
1ni.
1ni1a
2ni2ns
n1i2n1h
n1int
n1in3f
1nis
nis1s
ni1ern
ni1en
nie3s1se
nies2s
ni1el
ni1b
1n1id
ni1de1
1nig
3ni2g.
nig1re
ni2gel
ni1ge
3nig1k
1nik
ni4ken
ni1ke
ni1ta
1niz
2ns
n2s1ar
ns1ang
n3s2as3
ns3ac2ht
n1sac
ns1ab
n1sa1la
ns1alt
ns1aus
n2s1au2f
ns1ak
2n2s1i2n1s
n1si
n2s1int
ns1s
n2schli
n1sc
ns2chl
nschlie4
ns1ers2
n1se
ns1er1k
ns1erm
ns1er1w
n2s1ec
nse1le
nsequen4z3
nse1q
nsequ2
nsequ1en
n2s1ex
n2s1un
n1su
n1sü2
ns1ki
n1stan
ns3tanz
nsta1b
n1stad
n1stat
n1stam
ns1t1ru
n1sto
n1s2tie
ns1ti
n1s2til
n1s2t2if
n1s2teu
ns1te
n1stu
ns1pir
nsp2
n1spi
ns1pek
ns1pä
ns2pu
n1sy
n1ca
n1cr
n1ci
n1che
n1ce
2n1h
1ne
3ne1ar
3neal
ne1au
n2er.
ne1ra
ne1ro
n1erk
2nerz
n1er1zi
2ner1fa
nen1a
nen1i
nen3se
ne2ns
nen1st
1ne1ne2
2n1en1er
nen1dr2
n1ent1w
2n1ent1z
nei2n
n1ei1na
n1ein3f
ne1it
ne2sei
ne1se
ne1s1p2
2nec
n1eh2r1
2nee1
2ne1d
ne2lä
2nelt
ne1k1r
net1au
ne1ta
ne1t1r
ne2t1s
n1e1tu
2nemm
n1emp
3ne1w
2ne1p
2neff
2n1ex
n1b
nbe1ra
nb2er
nbe1s
1näl
nd1ar1b
nd1art
n1dan
n1dal
n1d1ak
n1dam
nd1rat
ndr2
nd3run
n1dru
nd1ort
ndo1s
nd1op
ndi3o
n1di
nde2a
n1de
n3der.
n2d1ei
n3dee2
n1dä
n2d1urs2
n1du
nd1u2m.
n2dum
nd1ta
n2dt
n1l
1nua
nu1ar
nu1an
2n1uni
n1und1
3nung
n1unt
1nu1i
1nus
nu1s1k
nu1e
1nug
1n2ut
n1um1g
1numm
n2g1at
n1ga
n1gra
n2g1or
n1go
nge1sa
n1ge
nges2
ng1lo
ng1li
1nü.
1nüs
n1üb
nü2l
1nüg
1nüt
n2kan
n1ka
nk1aus
n2k1ak
nkamp3fe
nkamp2
nk1rä
n1kr
nk1not
nkn2
n1ki
nk1s1am
nk1sa
nk1str
nks2t
nk1s1ti
n1ke
n2k1erf
n2k1är2
n1kä
n1kla
n1klo
nk1lic
n1klu
n1ku
nk1tü
n1ta
nt1ark
nt1art
n1ta1b1l
n2tauf
n2t1am
n1tr
nt2r2a.
n3trop
n2trin
n1t1ris
nt1ric
n2t1rec
nt1ru
n2t1rü
n1to
n3ti
n2ti1c
nt3s2o
n2ts
nt1s2t
nt1sp2
nt1hä
nt1hü
n3tem
n1te
ntezei4
nte1z
nte1ze
n1tä
n1tu
n1tü
nt1t
nt1z
n1tö
n1m
nmana3
n1ma
n3mas2
nme2n2s
n1me
n1w
n1p2
nprob3l
n1prob
n1z1an1
nz1i1ni
n1zi
n1fr
nfi2s
n1fi
n1fl
n2fu
n1fö
3nös
nö1c
1nöt
n1öf
1ny
i1a
ia1b
ial1a
ia2lie
ia1li
i2a1g
i3ag1n
1ir2on
i1r2ol
ir2n1er
ir1ne
i1ri
ir2s2
ir1c
i1re
i1rä
irk1l
ir1t1p2
i1o
io1ri
ion2
io2ns3
i2o1i
i2o1c
i2ob
io1li3
i2ol
i3o1ti
i2op
i1na
i2n1ai
i2n1a2s
in1au
i2n1a2m
in1or
i1nos
ino1st
i1nop
2in1ny
i1ni
ini2ke
i1nik
in1sa
i2ns
in3sc
ins2k
in1sp2
ins2z
in1c
i4ner1te
i1ne
i3nen
in1ei
ine2g
i3net
i1nä
in3dr2
indi1e
in1di
inundsieb1zi4
in1und1
inun2d1s
inund1si
inundsieb1z
in3ga
in1gr
ing1le
i1nü1
in1kn2
in2t1an
in1ta
in1th
inpor2
in1p2
in3f
i1nö
i1i2
i1sa
i2s1au
is3sa
is4s1ac
iss3erf
is1se
is1s1u
iss3tru
iss2t
i3sche
i1sc
i3schu
is3h
iser2a3
i1se
i2se3in3f
is1k
is1tal
is1tr
ist1ra
ist1ri
is2t1re
is1to
i1s2t2if
is1ti
is1th
i1stem
is1te
is1tu
is1pe
isp2
i1sy
i1ca
ich1al
i1cho
i1chi
i1che
i2ch1l
i1chu
icht3en1de
ic2ht
ich4tend
ich1te
ich3ten
i2ch3m
ich1w
i1cki
ic2k
ih1ar
i1han
i1hal
ih1r
i1ho
ih1n
i1hi
i1he
ih1l
i1hu
i2h1um
i1hö
ie1ran
ie1r1au
i1e1ro
ie2r1in
ie1ri
i1erc
ie2r1ec
ie1re
ie1rü1
ier1k
i1en1ar
ie1n1ab
i1en1r
ien1o
i1eni
i1en2s.
ie2ns
i1e2n1h
i2enen
ie1ne
ie3nei
i1en1b
i1end
i1eng
i1enk
i1en1m
i1en1v
i1en1w
i1en1p2
i1enz
i1en3f
i1en1j
iei2
ies2s
ie2sc
ies3che
iesch2
ie1s2ti
ie2c2k2
ie1e
ieen1
ie2br
ieb2se
ie2bs
ie1le
ie2le2h
i1el2l.
i1eu
ie2g1r
i1e1tä
i1ett
ie2fo
i1bri
i2bs2
ib1s2ti
i1be
ibe1ra
ib2er
i2b1ei
i1bä
ib1l
ib2lei
i1ä
i1da
id1r2
i1do
1ide2e.
i1de
i2dee2
1i1dy
i1la
il1ar
i2l1a2ns
il1ad
i2l1ak
i1lo
i1li
i2l1ind
il1ip
il1sp2
i2ls
i1le
il1eis
i1lä
i1lu
il2min
il1mi
i1u
iund1
ig1art
i1ga
ig1ro
ig1ri
i1g1rä
i1gna
ig1n
ig3sa
ig2s
ig3s2pr
igs1p2
ig1he
i2gh
ig1l
i1k1r
ik1in
ik1s2t
i1ke
ik1erz
i2k1ei
i2kä
ik1le
i1ku
ik1un
ik1ta
ik1th
ik1t1u
i1k1j
it1ar1b
it1art
it1a2b.
i2t3au2s.
i1taus
it1auf
it1am
it1ran
it1rau
i1tri
it1re
it1räu
i1tru
i1to
ito1ri1
i3ti
1iti1a
i4t1in
iti2ken
iti1ke
it2si
i2ts
it2s1e
its3pro3
itsp2
it1hi
it1hä
i3te2n
i1te
it1ei2n
i1tä
i1tu
i1t1ü
it3te
it2z3er1g
it1ze
i1tö
im1s2t
i1mä
i1mü
im1tr
i2v1r
i1v
ivi2s
i1w
i1pa
i1po
i1pi
ipi1en
ipi1el
i1ph
i1pe
ip1l
i1p2la
ip2pa
ip2fa
i1za
izi1el
i1zi
2if
